Wisconsin, session 2025, AB263.
do enact as follows:AB263,11Section 1. 40.51 (8m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB263,2,5240.51 (8m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance 3board under sub. (7) shall comply with ss. 631.95, 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (1) to 4(8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 5632.861, 632.867, 632.885, 632.89, and 632.895 (8) and (11) to (17).AB263,26Section 2. 49.46 (2) (b) 6. n. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,2,8749.46 (2) (b) 6. n. Breast screenings for which coverage is required under s. 8632.895 (8) (am).AB263,31Section 3. 66.0137 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB263,3,8266.0137 (4) Self-insured health plans. If a city, including a 1st class city, 3or a village provides health care benefits under its home rule power, or if a town 4provides health care benefits, to its officers and employees on a self-insured basis, 5the self-insured plan shall comply with ss. 49.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 6632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and (b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.85, 7632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) 8(8) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB263,49Section 4. 120.13 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB263,3,1310120.13 (2) (g) Every self-insured plan under par. (b) shall comply with ss. 1149.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and 12(b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.798, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to 13(6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) (8) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB263,514Section 5. 609.80 of the statutes is amended to read:AB263,3,1915609.80 Coverage of mammograms. Defined network plans and preferred 16provider plans are subject to s. 632.895 (8). Coverage of mammograms under s. 17632.895 (8) may be subject to any requirements that the defined network plan or 18preferred provider plan imposes under s. 609.05 (2) and (3) on the coverage of other 19health care services obtained by enrollees.AB263,620Section 6. 632.895 (8) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 632.895 (8) (a) 1y.AB263,721Section 7. 632.895 (8) (a) 1b. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,3,2422632.895 (8) (a) 1b. “Breast magnetic resonance imaging” means a diagnostic 23tool that uses a powerful magnetic field, radio waves, and a computer to produce 24detailed pictures of the structures within the breast.AB263,81Section 8. 632.895 (8) (a) 1f. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,4,32632.895 (8) (a) 1f. “Breast tomosynthesis” means a procedure that uses X-rays 3to take a series of pictures of the inside of the breast from many different angles.AB263,94Section 9. 632.895 (8) (a) 1k. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,4,65632.895 (8) (a) 1k. “Breast ultrasound” means a noninvasive diagnostic tool 6that uses high-frequency sound.AB263,107Section 10. 632.895 (8) (a) 1p. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,4,108632.895 (8) (a) 1p. “Contrast-enhanced mammography” means a breast 9imaging technique that combines standard mammography with an intravenous 10injection of iodinated contrast material.AB263,1111Section 11. 632.895 (8) (a) 1s. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,4,1812632.895 (8) (a) 1s. “Diagnostic breast examination” means a medically 13necessary and appropriate examination of the breast, including an examination 14using breast magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, breast tomosynthesis, 15contrast-enhanced mammography, diagnostic mammography, and any other 16technology as determined in accordance with the most recent applicable guidelines 17of the National Comprehensive Cancer Network that is used to evaluate any of the 18following:AB263,4,2019a. An abnormality seen or suspected from a screening examination for breast 20cancer.AB263,4,2221b. An abnormality that is detected by a health care provider or patient by 22another means of examination.AB263,1223Section 12. 632.895 (8) (a) 1w. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,5,21632.895 (8) (a) 1w. “Diagnostic mammography” means a diagnostic tool that 2uses X-rays and is designed to evaluate an abnormality in the breast.AB263,133Section 13. 632.895 (8) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,5,54632.895 (8) (a) 5. “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 5632.745 (24).AB263,146Section 14. 632.895 (8) (a) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,5,157632.895 (8) (a) 6. “Supplemental breast screening examination” means a 8medically necessary and appropriate examination of the breast, including an 9examination using breast magnetic resonance imaging, breast ultrasound, breast 10tomosynthesis, contrast-enhanced mammography, and any other technology as 11determined in accordance with the most recent applicable guidelines of the 12National Comprehensive Cancer Network that is used to screen for breast cancer 13when there is no abnormality seen or suspected, based on personal or family 14medical history or additional factors that may increase an individual’s risk of breast 15cancer.AB263,1516Section 15. 632.895 (8) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB263,5,1817632.895 (8) (am) 1. Every disability insurance policy and self-insured health 18plan shall provide coverage of diagnostic breast examinations.AB263,6,2192. Every disability insurance policy and self-insured health plan shall provide 20coverage to an individual who is at increased risk of breast cancer, as determined in 21accordance with the most recent applicable guidelines of the National 22Comprehensive Cancer Network, or has heterogeneously or extremely dense breast 23tissue, as defined by the Breast Imaging-Reporting and Data System established by 1the American College of Radiology, for supplemental breast screening 2examinations.AB263,163Section 16. 632.895 (8) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 632.895 (8) (d) 1. 4and amended to read:AB263,6,105632.895 (8) (d) 1. Coverage is required under this subsection despite whether 6the woman shows any symptoms of breast cancer. Except as provided in subds. 2. 7and 3. and pars. (b), (c) and (e), coverage under this subsection may only be subject 8to exclusions and limitations, including deductibles, copayments and restrictions on 9excessive charges, that are applied to other radiological examinations covered under 10the disability insurance policy.AB263,1711Section 17. 632.895 (8) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,6,1412632.895 (8) (d) 2. A disability insurance policy or self-insured health plan may 13not impose on a covered individual a cost-sharing amount for a supplemental breast 14screening examination or diagnostic breast examination.AB263,1815Section 18. 632.895 (8) (d) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB263,7,216632.895 (8) (d) 3. If, under federal law, application of this paragraph would 17result in ineligibility for a health savings account under section 223 of the Internal 18Revenue Code, this paragraph shall apply to a health-savings-account-qualified 19high deductible health plan with respect to the deductible of such a plan only after 20the enrollee has satisfied the minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal 21Revenue Code, except with respect to items or services that are preventive care 22pursuant to section 223 (c) (2) (C) of the Internal Revenue Code, in which case this 1paragraph shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under section 2223 of the Internal Revenue Code has been satisfied.AB263,193Section 19. Initial applicability.AB263,7,64(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, the 5act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on January 1 of the year following 6the year in which this subsection takes effect, except as provided in sub. (2).AB263,7,117(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 8agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 9policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 10on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 11modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB263,2012Section 20. Effective date. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab263 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab263 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB263 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB263 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB263: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting